Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,103
Bonds; judicial approval; petition; contents.

The board of directors of the irrigation district or such holder or holders of any bond or bonds of the district shall file in the district court of the county in which the lands of the district, or some portion thereof, are situated, a petition praying in effect, that the proceedings aforesaid may be examined, approved, and confirmed by the court. The petition shall state the facts showing the proceedings had for the issue and sale of the bonds, and shall state generally that the irrigation district was duly organized, and that the first board of directors was duly elected; but the petition need not state the facts showing such organization of the district or the election of the first board of directors.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 60, p. 302;

Laws 1909, c. 159, § 1, p. 571;

R.S.1913, § 3516;

C.S.1922, § 2916;

C.S.1929, § 46-161;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,103.